Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 33. Nonresident Violator Compact

§ 3551.
Enactment of compact.

The Nonresident Violator Compact, hereinafter called “the compact,” is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3552.
Declaration of policy and purpose—Article I.

It is the policy of the party jurisdictions to:

seek compliance with the laws, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations relating to the operation of motor vehicles in each of the jurisdictions;

allow motorists to accept a traffic citation for certain violations and proceed on their way without delay whether or not the motorist is a resident of the jurisdiction in which the citation was issued;

extend cooperation to its fullest extent among the jurisdictions for obtaining compliance with the terms of a traffic citation issued in one jurisdiction to a resident of another jurisdiction;

maximize effective utilization of law enforcement personnel and assist court systems in the efficient disposition of traffic violations.

The purpose of this compact is to:

provide a means through which the party jurisdictions may participate in a reciprocal program to effectuate the policies enumerated in paragraph (a) above in a uniform and orderly manner;

provide for the fair and impartial treatment of traffic violators operating within party jurisdictions in recognition of the motorist’s right of due process and the sovereign status of a party jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3553.
Definitions—Article II.

In the Nonresident Violator Compact, the following words have the meaning indicated, unless the context requires otherwise.

“Citation” means any summons, ticket, or other official document issued by a police officer for a traffic violation containing an order which requires the motorist to respond.
(b) (1) “Citation” means any summons, ticket, or other official document issued by a police officer for a traffic violation containing an order which requires the motorist to respond.

“Collateral” means any cash or other security deposited to secure an appearance for trial, following the issuance by a police officer of a citation for a traffic violation.

“Compliance” means the act of answering a citation, summons, or subpoena through appearance at court, a tribunal, and/or payment of fines and costs.

“Court” means a court of law or traffic tribunal.

“Driver’s license” means any license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of the home jurisdiction.

“Home jurisdiction” means the jurisdiction that issued the driver’s license of the traffic violator.

“Issuing jurisdiction” means the jurisdiction in which the traffic citation was issued to the motorist.

“Jurisdiction” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

“Motorist” means a driver of a motor vehicle operating in a party jurisdiction other than the home jurisdiction.

“Personal recognizance” means an agreement by a motorist made at the time of issuance of the traffic citation that he or she will comply with the terms of that traffic citation.

“Police officer” means any individual authorized by the party jurisdiction to issue a citation for a traffic violation.

“Terms of the citation” means those options expressly stated upon the citation.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3554.
Procedure for issuing jurisdiction—Article III.

When issuing a citation for a traffic violation, a police officer shall issue the citation to a motorist who possesses a driver’s license issued by a party jurisdiction and shall not, subject to the exceptions noted in paragraph (b) of this article, require the motorist to post collateral to secure appearance, if the officer receives the motorist’s personal recognizance that he or she will comply with the terms of the citation.

Personal recognizance is acceptable only if not prohibited by law. If mandatory appearance is required, it should take place immediately following issuance of the citation.

Upon failure of a motorist to comply with the terms of a traffic citation, the appropriate official shall report the failure to comply to the licensing authority of the jurisdiction in which the traffic citation was issued. The report shall be made in accordance with procedures specified by the issuing jurisdiction and shall contain information as specified in the Compact Manual as minimum requirements for effective processing by the home jurisdiction.

Upon receipt of the report, the licensing authority of the issuing jurisdiction shall transmit to the licensing authority in the home jurisdiction of the motorist, the information in a form and content as contained in the Compact Manual.

The licensing authority of the issuing jurisdiction need not suspend the privilege of a motorist for whom a report has been transmitted.

The licensing authority of the issuing jurisdiction shall not transmit a report on any violation if the date of transmission is more than six months after the date on which the traffic citation was issued.

The licensing authority of the issuing jurisdiction shall not transmit a report on any violation where the date of issuance of the citation predates the most recent of the effective dates of entry for the two jurisdictions affected.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3555.
Procedure for home jurisdiction—Article IV.

Upon receipt of a report of a failure to comply from the licensing authority of the issuing jurisdiction, the licensing authority of the home jurisdiction shall notify the motorist and initiate a suspension action, in accordance with the home jurisdiction’s procedures, to suspend the motorist’s driver’s license until satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the traffic citation has been furnished to the home jurisdiction licensing authority. Due process safeguards will be accorded.

The licensing authority of the home jurisdiction shall maintain a record of actions taken and make reports to issuing jurisdictions as provided in the Compact Manual.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3556.
Applicability of other laws—Article V.

Except as expressly required by provisions of this compact, nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect the right of any party jurisdiction to apply any of its other laws relating to license to drive to any person or circumstance, or to invalidate or prevent any driver license agreement or other cooperative arrangements between a party jurisdiction and a nonparty jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3557.
Compact administrator procedures—Article VI.

For the purpose of administering the provisions of this compact and to serve as a governing body for the resolution of all matters relating to the operation of this compact, a Board of Compact Administrators is established. The Board shall be composed of one representative from each party jurisdiction to be known as the compact administrator. The compact administrator shall be appointed by the jurisdiction executive and will serve and be subject to removal in accordance with the laws of the jurisdiction he or she represents. A compact administrator may provide for the discharge of his or her duties and the performance of his or her functions as a board member by an alternate. An alternate may not be entitled to serve unless written notification of his or her identity has been given to the Board.

Each member of the Board of Compact Administrators shall be entitled to one vote. No action of the Board shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of votes on the Board are cast in favor. Action by the Board shall be only at a meeting at which a majority of the party jurisdictions are represented.

The Board shall elect annually, from its membership, a chairman and vice chairman.

The Board shall adopt bylaws, not inconsistent with the provisions of this compact or the laws of a party jurisdiction, for the conduct of its business and shall have the power to amend and rescind its bylaws.

The Board may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any and all donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, conditional or otherwise, from any jurisdiction, the United States, or any other governmental agency, and may receive, utilize, and dispose of the same.

The Board may contract with, or accept services or personnel from any governmental or intergovernmental agency, person, firm, or corporation, or any private nonprofit organization or institution.

The Board shall formulate all necessary procedures and develop uniform forms and documents for administering the provisions of this compact. All procedures and forms adopted pursuant to board action shall be contained in the Compact Manual.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3558.
Entry into compact and withdrawal—Article VII.

This compact shall become effective when it has been adopted by at least two jurisdictions.

Entry into the compact shall be made by a Resolution of Ratification executed by the authorized officials of the applying jurisdiction and submitted to the Chairman of the Board.
(b) (1) Entry into the compact shall be made by a Resolution of Ratification executed by the authorized officials of the applying jurisdiction and submitted to the Chairman of the Board.

The resolution shall be in a form and content as provided in the Compact Manual and shall include statements that in substance are as follows:

(i)

a citation of the authority by which the jurisdiction is empowered to become a party to this compact;

(ii)

agreement to comply with the terms and provisions of the compact;

(iii)

that compact entry is with all jurisdictions then party to the compact and with any jurisdiction that legally becomes a party to the compact.

The effective date of entry shall be specified by the applying jurisdiction, but it shall not be less than 60 days after notice has been given by the Chairman of the Board of Compact Administrators or by the secretariat of the Board to each party jurisdiction that the resolution from the applying jurisdiction has been received.

A party jurisdiction may withdraw from this compact by official written notice to the other party jurisdictions, but a withdrawal shall not take effect until 90 days after notice of withdrawal is given. The notice shall be directed to the compact administrator of each member jurisdiction. No withdrawal shall affect the validity of this compact as to the remaining party jurisdictions.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3559.
Exceptions—Article VIII.

The provisions of this compact shall not apply to parking or standing violations, highway weight limit violations, and violations of law governing the transportation of hazardous materials.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3560.
Amendments to the compact—Article IX.

This compact may be amended from time to time. Amendments shall be presented in resolution form to the Chairman of the Board of Compact Administrators and may be initiated by one or more party jurisdictions.

Adoption of an amendment shall require endorsement of all party jurisdictions and shall become effective 30 days after the date of the last endorsement.

Endorsement of an amendment shall only be by act of the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3561.
Construction and severability—Article X.

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes stated herein.
The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of any party jurisdiction or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government agency, person, or circumstance, the compact shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the Constitution of any jurisdiction party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining jurisdictions and in full force and effect as to the jurisdiction affected as to all severable matters.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.

§ 3562.
Title—Article XI.

This compact shall be known as the Nonresident Violator Compact of 1977, as amended.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 84

, § 1.